Florida, session 2026, SB802.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 55 56 Section 1.âSection 20.71, Florida Statutes, is created to 57 read: 58 20.71âResidency requirements.âNotwithstanding any other 59 law: 60 (1)(a)âEffective October 1, 2026, each of the following 61 persons must be a United States citizen and a resident of this 62 state: 63 1.âThe secretary of a department. 64 2.âThe executive director of a department. 65 3.âThe chief administrative officer of any unit of state 66 government which is housed under a department for administrative 67 purposes but is not subject to the control, supervision, or 68 direction of such department. 69 4.âA member of a commission. 70 5.âA member of a licensing board. 71 6.âThe chair of the governing board, or the chief 72 executive, of a statewide entity that is explicitly created or 73 established by statute, regardless of its legal form, for a 74 public purpose or to carry out a government program and that is 75 not under the direct control of a governmental entity. 76 7.âAny other person appointed to hold state office in the 77 executive branch of state government. 78 (b)âIf a person listed in paragraph (a) does not meet the 79 requirements of that paragraph, such personâs office is 80 automatically deemed vacant. 81 (2)âEffective January 6, 2027, each member of a state 82 university board of trustees must be a United States citizen and 83 either a resident of this state or a graduate of the state 84 university, the administration of which is overseen by such 85 board of trustees. If any member of a state university board of 86 trustees does not meet the requirements of this subsection, such 87 memberâs office is automatically deemed vacant. 88 (3)âEffective January 6, 2027, each member of the Board of 89 Governors of the State University System must be a United States 90 citizen and either a resident of this state or a graduate of a 91 state university as defined in s. 1000.21. If any member of the 92 Board of Governors does not meet the requirements of this 93 subsection, such memberâs office is automatically deemed vacant. 94 Section 2.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 104.31, 95 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 96 104.31âPolitical activities of state, county, and municipal 97 officers and employees.â 98 (1)âNo officer or employee of the state, or of any county 99 or municipality thereof, except as hereinafter exempted from 100 provisions hereof, shall: 101 (a)âUse his or her official authority or influence for the 102 purpose of interfering with an election or a nomination of 103 office or coercing or influencing another personâs vote or 104 affecting the result thereof. 105 (b)âUse his or her official authority or influence to 106 directly or indirectly coerce or attempt to coerce, command, 107 solicit, or advise any other person officer or employee to make 108 a contribution as defined in s. 106.011 or to pay, lend, or 109 contribute any part of his or her salary, or any money, or 110 anything else of value to any political party, candidate for 111 public office, political committee, organization, agency, or 112 person for political purposes. Nothing in this paragraph or in 113 any county or municipal charter or ordinance shall prohibit an 114 officer or employee from suggesting to another person employee 115 in a noncoercive manner that he or she may voluntarily make a 116 contribution as defined in s. 106.011 or pay, lend, or 117 contribute money or anything else of value to any political 118 party, candidate for public office, political committee, 119 organization, agency, or person to a fund which is administered 120 by a party, committee, organization, agency, person, labor union 121 or other employee organization for political purposes. 122 (c)âDirectly or indirectly coerce or attempt to coerce, 123 command, and advise any such officer or employee as to where he 124 or she might purchase commodities or to interfere in any other 125 way with the personal right of said officer or employee. 126 127 The provisions of This section may shall not be construed so as 128 to prevent any person from becoming a candidate for and actively 129 campaigning for any elective office in this state. All such 130 persons shall retain the right to vote as they may choose and to 131 express their opinions on all political subjects and candidates. 132 The provisions of Paragraph (a) may shall not be construed so as 133 to limit the political activity in a general, special, primary, 134 bond, referendum, or other election of any kind or nature, of 135 elected officials or candidates for public office in the state 136 or of any county or municipality thereof; and the provisions of 137 paragraph (a) shall not be construed so as to limit the 138 political activity in general or special elections of the 139 officials appointed as the heads or directors of state 140 administrative agencies, boards, commissions, or committees or 141 of the members of state boards, commissions, or committees, 142 whether they be salaried, nonsalaried, or reimbursed for 143 expense. In the event of a dual capacity of any member of a 144 state board, commission, or committee, any restrictive 145 provisions applicable to either capacity shall apply. The 146 provisions of paragraph (a) shall not be construed so as to 147 limit the political activity in a general, special, primary, 148 bond, referendum, or other election of any kind or nature of the 149 Governor, the elected members of the Governorâs Cabinet, or the 150 members of the Legislature. The provisions of Paragraphs (b) and 151 (c) shall apply to all officers and employees of the state or of 152 any county or municipality thereof, whether elected, appointed, 153 or otherwise employed, or whether the activity is shall be in 154 connection with a primary, general, special, bond, referendum, 155 or other election of any kind or nature. 156 (2)âAn employee of the state or any political subdivision 157 may not participate in any political campaign for an elective 158 office while on duty. 159 Section 3.âSubsection (4) of section 112.061, Florida 160 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (j) is added to subsection 161 (3) of that section, to read: 162 112.061âPer diem and travel expenses of public officers, 163 employees, and authorized persons; statewide travel management 164 system.â 165 (3)âAUTHORITY TO INCUR TRAVEL EXPENSES.â 166 (j)âReimbursement of transportation expenses as provided in 167 subsection (7) may not be authorized or approved for travel of a 168 person serving in a position described in s. 20.71(1)(a)1., 2., 169 or 3. between the personâs residence and his or her official 170 headquarters. Per diem and subsistence allowances as provided in 171 subsection (6) may not be authorized or approved for a person 172 serving in a position described in s. 20.71(1)(a)1., 2., or 3. 173 when that person remains overnight in the personâs county of 174 residence. For the purposes of this section, the term 175 âresidenceâ means the dwelling in which the person permanently 176 resides. 177 (4)âOFFICIAL HEADQUARTERS.âThe official headquarters of a 178 person serving in a position described in s. 20.71(1)(a)1., 2., 179 or 3. must be the city or town in which the departmentâs 180 official headquarters is located, and the official headquarters 181 of any other an officer or employee assigned to an office must 182 shall be the city or town in which the office is located except 183 that: 184 (a)âThe official headquarters of a person located in the 185 field must shall be the city or town nearest to the area where 186 the majority of the personâs work is performed, or such other 187 city, town, or area as may be designated by the agency head 188 provided that in all cases such designation must be in the best 189 interests of the agency and not for the convenience of the 190 person. 191 (b)âWhen any state employee is stationed in any city or 192 town for a period of more than over 30 continuous workdays, such 193 city or town must shall be deemed to be the employeeâs official 194 headquarters, and he or she may shall not be allowed per diem or 195 subsistence, as provided in this section, after such the said 196 period of 30 continuous workdays has elapsed, unless this period 197 of time is extended by the express approval of the agency head 198 or his or her designee. 199 (c)âA traveler may leave his or her assigned post to return 200 to his or her residence home overnight, over a weekend, or 201 during a holiday, but any time lost from regular duties must 202 shall be taken as annual leave and authorized in the usual 203 manner. The traveler may shall not be reimbursed for travel 204 expenses in excess of the established rate for per diem 205 allowable had he or she remained at his or her assigned post. A 206 person serving in a position described in s. 20.71(1)(a)1., 2., 207 or 3. may not be reimbursed for travel expenses for travel 208 between the personâs assigned post and residence. However, when 209 a traveler has been temporarily assigned away from his or her 210 official headquarters for an approved period extending beyond 30 211 days, he or she is shall be entitled to reimbursement for travel 212 expenses at the established rate of one round trip for each 30 213 day period actually taken to his or her residence home in 214 addition to pay and allowances otherwise provided. 215 (d)âA Lieutenant Governor who permanently resides outside 216 of Leon County, may, if he or she so requests, have an 217 appropriate facility in his or her county designated as his or 218 her official headquarters for purposes of this section. This 219 official headquarters may only serve as the Lieutenant 220 Governorâs personal office. The Lieutenant Governor may not use 221 state funds to lease space in any facility for his or her 222 official headquarters. 223 1.âA Lieutenant Governor for whom an official headquarters 224 is established in his or her county of residence pursuant to 225 this paragraph is eligible for subsistence at a rate to be 226 established by the Governor for each day or partial day that the 227 Lieutenant Governor is at the State Capitol to conduct official 228 state business. In addition to the subsistence allowance, a 229 Lieutenant Governor is eligible for reimbursement for 230 transportation expenses as provided in subsection (7) for travel 231 between the Lieutenant Governorâs official headquarters and the 232 State Capitol to conduct state business. 233 2.âPayment of subsistence and reimbursement for 234 transportation between a Lieutenant Governorâs official 235 headquarters and the State Capitol shall be made to the extent 236 appropriated funds are available, as determined by the Governor. 237 3.âThis paragraph expires July 1, 2025. 238 Section 4.âSection 112.31251, Florida Statutes, is created 239 to read: 240 112.31251âDefinition of the term âoffice.ââ 241 (1)(a)âFor purposes of s. 5(a), Art. II of the State 242 Constitution, the term âoffice,â when referring to an office in 243 this state, means any position in state, county, or municipal 244 government to which all of the following apply: 245 1.âThe position delegates to the individual holding such 246 position a portion of the sovereign power of the government. 247 2.âThe position requires the exercise of independent 248 governmental authority, which is performed in an official 249 capacity and is not based solely on a contractual or employment 250 relationship. 251 3.âThe position has a prescribed tenure. 252 4.âThe position exists independently of the individual 253 holding such position. 254 (b)âThe term âofficeâ includes, but is not limited to, each 255 of the following positions: 256 1.âThe Governor. 257 2.âThe Lieutenant Governor. 258 3.âA member of the Cabinet. 259 4.âA state senator. 260 5.âA state representative. 261 6.âA county commissioner. 262 7.âA sheriff. 263 8.âA tax collector. 264 9.âA property appraiser. 265 10.âA supervisor of elections. 266 11.âA clerk of the circuit court. 267 12.âA member of the Board of Governors of the State 268 University System. 269 13.âA member of a board of trustees for a state university. 270 14.âA member of a district school board. 271 15.âA member of a state, county, or municipal board or 272 commission that exercises governmental authority and is not 273 purely advisory in nature. 274 16.âA member of the board of governors for the Citizens 275 Property Insurance Corporation established under s. 627.351(6). 276 17.âA member of the board of directors for the Florida 277 Housing Finance Corporation established under s. 420.504. 278 18.âA member of the board of directors for the Florida 279 Healthy Kids Corporation established under s. 624.91, other than 280 the member appointed pursuant to s. 624.91(6)(a)9. 281 19.âAn administrator or a manager of a county, a 282 municipality, or a corporation established under s. 420.504, s. 283 s. 624.91, or s. 627.351(6) who exercises in his or her own 284 right any sovereign power or any prescribed independent 285 authority of a governmental nature. 286 20.âThe director of a county or municipal emergency 287 management agency who exercises in his or her own right any 288 sovereign power or any prescribed independent authority of a 289 governmental nature. 290 21.âA state, county, or municipal law enforcement officer 291 with the authority to arrest without a warrant. 292 22.âAny position that meets all the criteria enumerated in 293 paragraph (a). 294 (2)âThe term âofficeâ does not include either of the 295 following: 296 (a)âA legislative designation of an officer to perform ex 297 officio the functions of another office; or 298 (b)âThe position of an individual whose relationship with a 299 state, county, or municipal government is considered employment. 300 For purposes of this paragraph, the term âemploymentâ means a 301 relationship with a state, county, or municipal government in 302 which an individual does not exercise in his or her own right 303 any sovereign power or any prescribed independent authority of a 304 governmental nature. 305 Section 5.âPresent paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of 306 subsection (1) and present subsection (8) of section 112.3261, 307 Florida Statutes, are redesignated as paragraphs (c), (d), and 308 (e) of subsection (1) and subsection (9), respectively, a new 309 paragraph (b) is added to subsection (1) and a new subsection 310 (8) is added to that section, and subsection (7) of that section 311 is amended, to read: 312 112.3261âLobbying before water management districts; 313 registration and reporting.â 314 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 315 (b)ââExpenditureâ has the same meaning as in s. 112.3215. 316 (7)âUpon receipt of a sworn complaint alleging that a 317 lobbyist or principal has failed to register with a district, 318 has made a prohibited expenditure, or has knowingly submitted 319 false information in a report or registration required under 320 this section, the commission shall investigate a lobbyist or 321 principal pursuant to the procedures established under s. 322 112.324. The commission shall provide the Governor with a report 323 of its findings and recommendations in any investigation 324 conducted pursuant to this subsection. The Governor is 325 authorized to enforce the commissionâs findings and 326 recommendations. 327 (8)âNotwithstanding s. 112.3148, s. 112.3149, or any other 328 law, a lobbyist or principal may not make, directly or 329 indirectly, and a district governing board member, executive 330 director, or any district employee who qualifies as a local 331 officer as defined in s. 112.3145(1) may not knowingly accept, 332 directly or indirectly, any expenditure. 333 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 1001.71, Florida 334 Statutes, is amended to read: 335 1001.71âUniversity boards of trustees; membership.â 336 (1)âPursuant to s. 7(c), Art. IX of the State Constitution, 337 each local constituent university shall be administered by a 338 university board of trustees comprised of 13 members as follows: 339 6 citizen members appointed by the Governor subject to 340 confirmation by the Senate; 5 citizen members appointed by the 341 Board of Governors subject to confirmation by the Senate; the 342 chair of the faculty senate or the equivalent; and the president 343 of the student body of the university. The appointed members 344 shall serve staggered 5-year terms. In order to achieve 345 staggered terms, beginning July 1, 2003, of the initial 346 appointments by the Governor, 2 members shall serve 2-year 347 terms, 3 members shall serve 3-year terms, and 1 member shall 348 serve a 5-year term and of the initial appointments by the Board 349 of Governors, 2 members shall serve 2-year terms, 2 members 350 shall serve 3-year terms, and 1 member shall serve a 5-year 351 term. There shall be no state residency requirement For 352 university board members, but the Governor and the Board of 353 Governors shall consider diversity and regional representation. 354 Beginning July 2, 2020, for purposes of this subsection, 355 regional representation shall include the chair of a campus 356 board established pursuant to s. 1004.341. 357 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.